New York, session 2025-2026, S685.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The prohibitions in paragraph (b) of subdivision 6 and 2 subdivision 7 of section 11-104 of the energy law and subdivision 19 of 3 section 378 of the executive law, as added by part RR of chapter 56 of 4 the laws of 2023, shall not apply to any new building for which a site 5 plan or subdivision plat has been approved by the local planning board 6 prior to December 31, 2025. 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02754-03-5